Utah statutes.
78B-6-705.   Alteration or modification of product after sale as substantial contributing cause -- Manufacturer or seller not liable.

For purposes of Section 78B-5-818, fault shall include an alteration or modification of the product, which occurred subsequent to the sale by the manufacturer or seller to the initial user or consumer, and which changed the purpose, use, function, design, or intended use or manner of use of the product from that for which the product was originally designed, tested, or intended.

